South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3581.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 59-101-290 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 59-101-290.  (A) A public institution of higher learning shall notify incoming students, or the parent or guardian of an incoming student under the age of eighteen, of the risk of contracting meningococcal disease A and B, and Hepatitis B, if living in on-campus student housing. (B) Every student who attends a public institution of higher learning in this State must be vaccinated for meningococcal disease A and B, and Hepatitis B, during the entirety of their enrollment at the institution and furnish evidence of compliance with this requirement prior to enrollment and thereafter as requested by the institution to demonstrate ongoing compliance. A public institution of higher learning shall includerequire proof of current vaccination against meningococcal disease A and B, and Hepatitis B, as recommended immunization in health and medical information provided to students or prospective students and parents or guardians a requirement for enrollment and may not enroll a student who fails to receive such vaccinations unless excused by a physician for medical reasons. (C) A private institution of higher learning may elect to be governed by this section and at any time may, in its sole discretion, remove itself from such governance. (D) "Public institution of higher learning" means any state-supported, post-secondary educational institution and also must include technical and comprehensive educational institutions. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----